test/src/morphology/N-el_gt-norm.yaml
Config:
  hfst:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.hfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.hfst
  xerox:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.xfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.xfst
    App: lookup

Tests:



# todo:
# Proofread the gold standard (below)
# Then: run analyser, then correct.


  Noun - eļ: # Noun 133 'eng /est põrgu/fin' - full paradigm
     eļ+N+Sg+Nom: eļ
     eļ+N+Sg+Gen: eļ
     eļ+N+Sg+Par: eļļõ
     eļ+N+Sg+Dat: eļļõn
     eļ+N+Sg+Ins: eļļõks
     eļ+N+Sg+Ill: eļļõ
     eļ+N+Sg+Ela: eļštõ
     eļ+N+Pl+Nom: eļļõd
     eļ+N+Pl+Gen: eļļõd
     eļ+N+Pl+Par: eļļidi
     eļ+N+Pl+Dat: eļļõdõn
     eļ+N+Pl+Ins: eļļõdõks
     eļ+N+Pl+Ill: eļļiž
     eļ+N+Pl+Ela: eļļist
